District of Columbia statutes.
16-1904

Forfeiture and penalty for failure to produce.

If an officer or other person to whom a writ of habeas corpus is directed neglects or refuses to:

(1)

make return of the writ; or

(2)

bring the body of the person detained —

according to the command of the writ, he shall forfeit to the person detained the sum of $500, and be liable to attachment and punishment as for a contempt.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 584, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
1973 Ed., § 16-1904.
1981 Ed., § 16-1904.